Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Chapter 9 Fire Protection

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

13 Am. Jur. 2d Buildings §§ 23 to 30; 35A Am. Jur. 2d Fires §§ 1 to 5.

Constitutionality of fire prevention provisions of forest conservation legislation, 13 ALR2d 1095.

Constitutional rights of owner involved in the destruction of buildings lying in path of fire, 14 ALR2d 73.

Causal connection between fireman's performance of official duties and his disability, for purpose of recovering disability benefits, 27 ALR2d 974.

Relationship between fireman's performance of official duties and his death, for purpose of recovery of benefits by survivors, 27 ALR2d 1004.

Liability for personal injury or damage from operation of fire department vehicle, 82 ALR2d 312.

Validity, construction, and application of regulation regarding outside employment or occupation of firemen,88 ALR2d 1235, 94 ALR3d 1230.

Validity of statute imposing upon owner or occupant liability for expense of fighting fire starting on his land on property, 90 ALR2d 873.

Giving false fire alarm by telephone as minor criminal offense, 97 ALR2d 503.

Right to repair or reconstruct building operating as nonconforming use, after damage or destruction by fire or other casualty, 57 ALR3d 419.

Liability of innkeeper to guest for injury due to fire, 60 ALR3d 1217.

Liability of person furnishing, installing or servicing burglary or fire alarm system for burglary or fire loss, 37 ALR4th 47.

Validity and construction of statutes or ordinances imposing civil or criminal penalties on alarm system users, installers, or servicers for false alarms, 17 ALR5th 825.

Validity, construction, and application of the Uniform Fire Code, 46 ALR5th 479.

Validity, construction, and application of regulations regarding outside employment of governmental employees or officers, 62 ALR5th 671.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance requiring installation of automatic sprinklers, 63 ALR5th 517.

Judicial construction of Flammable Fabrics Act (15 U.S.C. §§ 1191-1204), 19 ALR Fed 837.

36A C.J.S. Fires §§ 17, 18.